Utah statutes.
59-1-1002.   Audit interviews.

(1)  During any audit interview, the commission shall:

(a)  require reasonable scheduling of its audit interviews;

(b)  permit recording of audit interviews;

(c)  explain its audit and collection process before the first interview; and

(d)  allow a taxpayer to be represented at an interview by an attorney or other representative with power of attorney.

(2)  The commission may not require a taxpayer to bring his attorney or other representative to interviews.



Enacted by Chapter 35, 1991 General Session

